Washington statutes.
RCW 15.140.120

Limitation of enforcement of certain laws and rules.

Beginning on April 26, 2019:

(1)(a) No law or rule related to certified or interstate hemp seeds applies to or may be enforced against a person with a license to produce or process hemp issued under this chapter; and

(b) No department or other state agency rule may establish or enforce a buffer zone or distance requirement between a person with a license or authorization to produce or process hemp under this chapter and a person with a license to produce or process cannabis issued under chapter 69.50 RCW. The department may not adopt rules without the evaluation of sufficient data showing impacts to either crop as a result of cross-pollination.

(2) Notwithstanding the rule-making provisions of RCW 15.140.030(2), if a cannabis producer or cannabis processor licensed by the liquor and cannabis board under chapter 69.50 RCW is engaged in producing or processing hemp at the same location for which they are licensed to produce or process cannabis, the liquor and cannabis board may test samples represented as hemp that are obtained from a location licensed for cannabis production or cannabis processing for the sole purpose of validating THC content of products represented as hemp. Any product with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration exceeding 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis is considered cannabis and is subject to the provisions of chapter 69.50 RCW.

[ 2022 c 16 s 21; 2021 c 104 s 4; 2019 c 158 s 16.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Intent—2021 c 104: See note following RCW 15.140.020.